Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.415

Electrical utilities—Civil immunity of officials and employees for good faith mistakes and errors of judgment.

Officials and employees of cities and towns shall be immune from civil liability for mistakes and errors of judgment in the good faith performance of acts within the scope of their official duties involving the exercise of judgment and discretion which relate solely to their responsibilities for electrical utilities. This grant of immunity shall not be construed as modifying the liability of the city or town.

[ 1983 1st ex.s. c 48 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 1st ex.s. c 48: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1983 1st ex.s. c 48 s 4.]